Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-845
Deposit of city funds; conditions.

The city treasurer of a city of the primary class shall deposit and at all times keep on deposit for safekeeping in banks, capital stock financial institutions, qualifying mutual financial institutions, or any of such banks or institutions doing business in such city of approved and responsible standing all money collected, received, or held by him or her as city treasurer. Any such bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution located in the city may apply for the privilege of keeping such money or any part thereof upon the following conditions: (1) All such deposits shall be subject to payment when demanded by the city treasurer; and (2) such deposits shall be subject to all regulations imposed by law or adopted by the city for the receiving and holding thereof. The fact that a stockholder, director, or other officer of such bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution shall also be serving as mayor, as a member of the city council, or as any other officer of such city shall not disqualify such bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution from acting as a depository for such municipal funds. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1963, c. 54, § 1, p. 232;

Laws 1987, LB 440, § 2;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 13;

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 14;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 14;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 151.